California statutes. Family Code
The property divided pursuant to Section 2251 is liable for debts of the parties to the same extent as if the property had been community property or quasi-community property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2253.

In a proceeding under this part, custody of the children shall be determined according to Division 8 (commencing with Section 3000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2254.

The court may, during the pendency of a proceeding for nullity of marriage or upon judgment of nullity of marriage, order a party to pay for the support of the other party in the same manner as if the marriage had not been void or voidable if the party for whose benefit the order is made is found to be a putative spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2255.

The court may grant attorney’s fees and costs in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 2030) of Part 1 in proceedings to have the marriage adjudged void and in those proceedings based upon voidable marriage in which the party applying for attorney’s fees and costs is found to be innocent of fraud or wrongdoing in inducing or entering into the marriage, and free from knowledge of the then existence of any prior marriage or other impediment to the contracting of the marriage for which a judgment of nullity is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 108.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE AND LEGAL SEPARATION [2300. - 2452.]



  CHAPTER 1. Effect of Dissolution [2300. - 2300.]

2300.

The effect of a judgment of dissolution of marriage when it becomes final is to restore the parties to the state of unmarried persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Grounds for Dissolution or Legal Separation [2310. - 2313.]

2310.

Dissolution of the marriage or legal separation of the parties may be based on either of the following grounds, which shall be pleaded generally:

(a) Irreconcilable differences, which have caused the irremediable breakdown of the marriage.

(b) Permanent legal incapacity to make decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 9.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2311.

Irreconcilable differences are those grounds which are determined by the court to be substantial reasons for not continuing the marriage and which make it appear that the marriage should be dissolved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2312.

A marriage may be dissolved on the grounds of permanent legal incapacity to make decisions only upon proof, including competent medical or psychiatric testimony, that the spouse was at the time the petition was filed, and remains, permanently lacking the legal capacity to make decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 10.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2313.

No dissolution of marriage granted on the ground of permanent legal incapacity to make decisions relieves a spouse from any obligation imposed by law as a result of the marriage for the support of the spouse who lacks legal capacity to make decisions, and the court may make an order for support, or require a bond therefor, as the circumstances require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 11.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Residence Requirements [2320. - 2322.]

2320.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a judgment of dissolution of marriage may not be entered unless one of the parties to the marriage has been a resident of this state for six months and of the county in which the proceeding is filed for three months next preceding the filing of the petition.

(b) (1) A judgment for dissolution, nullity, or legal separation of a marriage between persons of the same sex may be entered, even if neither spouse is a resident of, or maintains a domicile in, this state at the time the proceedings are filed, if the following apply:

(A) The marriage was entered in California.

(B) Neither party to the marriage resides in a jurisdiction that will dissolve the marriage. If the jurisdiction does not recognize the marriage, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the jurisdiction will not dissolve the marriage.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the superior court in the county where the marriage was entered shall be the proper court for the proceeding. The dissolution, nullity, or legal separation shall be adjudicated in accordance with California law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 721, Sec. 4.   (SB 651)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2321.

(a) In a proceeding for legal separation of the parties in which neither party, at the time the proceeding was commenced, has complied with the residence requirements of Section 2320, either party may, upon complying with the residence requirements, amend the party’s petition or responsive pleading in the proceeding to request that a judgment of dissolution of the marriage be entered. The date of the filing of the amended petition or pleading shall be deemed to be the date of commencement of the proceeding for the dissolution of the marriage for the purposes only of the residence requirements of Section 2320.

(b) If the other party has appeared in the proceeding, notice of the amendment shall be given to the other party in the manner provided by rules adopted by the Judicial Council. If no appearance has been made by the other party in the proceeding, notice of the amendment may be given to the other party by mail to the last known address
 of the other party, or by personal service, if the intent of the party to so amend upon satisfaction of the residence requirements of Section 2320 is set forth in the initial petition or pleading in the manner provided by rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2322.

For the purpose of a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, each spouse may have a separate domicile or residence depending upon proof of the fact and not upon legal presumptions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 27.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. General Procedural Provisions [2330. - 2348.]

2330.

(a) A proceeding for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation of the parties is commenced by filing a petition or joint petition entitled “In re the marriage of ____ and ____,” which shall state whether it is a petition for dissolution of the marriage or for legal separation of the parties.

(b) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation of the parties, the petition shall set forth, among other matters, as nearly as can be ascertained, the following facts:

(1) The date of marriage.

(2) The date of
 separation.

(3) The number of years from marriage to separation.

(4) The number of children of the marriage, if any, and if none a statement of that fact.

(5) The age and birth date of each minor child of the marriage.

(c) In a joint petition proceeding for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation of the parties, the joint petition shall set forth, among other matters, as nearly as can be ascertained, the following facts:

(1) The date of the marriage.

(2) (A) If there are children of the marriage, all of the following information:

(i) The number of children.

(ii) The age of each child.

(iii) The date of birth of each child.

(B) If there are no children of the marriage, a statement of that fact.

(3) (A) A list of issues upon which the parties intend to resolve by agreement, which may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) The legal grounds for dissolution or legal separation.

(ii) The date of separation.

(iii) Child custody.

(iv) Child support.

(v) Spousal support or domestic partner support.

(vi) Separate property.

(vii) Community and quasi-community property.

(viii) Restoration of former name.

 (ix) Attorney’s fees and costs.

(B) The list of issues required by subparagraph (A) shall represent all of the matters at issue in the dissolution. If the parties have an issue that they do not intend to resolve by agreement, they shall file a petition pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2330.1.

In any proceeding for dissolution of marriage, for legal separation of the parties, or for the support of children, the petition or complaint may list children born before the marriage to the same parties and, pursuant to the terms of the Uniform Parentage Act, a determination of paternity may be made in the action. In addition, a supplemental complaint may be filed, in any of those proceedings, pursuant to Section 464 of the Code of Civil Procedure, seeking a judgment or order of paternity or support for a child of the mother and father of the child whose paternity and support are already in issue before the court. A supplemental complaint for paternity or support of children may be filed without leave of court either before or after final judgment in the underlying action. Service of the supplemental summons and complaint shall be made in the manner provided for the initial service of a summons by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 581, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2330.3.

(a) All dissolution actions, to the greatest extent possible, shall be assigned to the same superior court department for all purposes, in order that all decisions in a case through final judgment shall be made by the same judicial officer. However, if the assignment will result in a significant delay of any family law matter, the dissolution action need not be assigned to the same superior court department for all purposes, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(b) The Judicial Council shall adopt a standard of judicial administration prescribing a minimum length of assignment of a judicial officer to a family law assignment.

(c) This section shall be operative on July 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 352, Sec. 7.   (AB 939)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2330.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if no demand for money, property, costs, or attorney’s fees is contained in the petition and the judgment of dissolution of marriage is entered by default, the filing of income and expense declarations and property declarations in connection therewith shall not be required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2331.

(a) A copy of the petition, together with a copy of a summons, in a form and content approved by the Judicial Council, shall be served upon the other party to the marriage in the same manner as service of papers in civil actions generally.

(b) If the parties file a joint petition and joint summons, in a form and content approved by the Judicial Council, the joint petition shall be deemed to be served on both parties upon the filing of the joint petition with the court and both parties shall be determined to have appeared in the matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2332.

(a) If the petition for dissolution of the marriage is based on the ground of permanent legal incapacity to make decisions and the spouse who lacks legal capacity to make decisions has a guardian or conservator, other than the spouse filing the petition, the petition and summons shall be served upon the spouse and the guardian or conservator. The guardian or conservator shall defend and protect the interests of the spouse who lacks legal capacity to make decisions.

(b) If the spouse who lacks legal capacity to make decisions has no guardian or conservator, or if the spouse filing the petition is the guardian or conservator, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem, who may be the district attorney or the county counsel, if
 any, to defend and protect the interests of the spouse who lacks legal capacity to make decisions. If a district attorney or county counsel is appointed guardian ad litem pursuant to this subdivision, the successor in the office of district attorney or county counsel, as the case may be, succeeds as guardian ad litem, without further action by the court or parties.

(c) “Guardian or conservator” as used in this section means:

(1) With respect to the issue of the dissolution of the marriage relationship, the guardian or conservator of the person.

(2) With respect to support and property division issues, the guardian or conservator of the estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 12.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2333.

Subject to Section 2334, if from the evidence at the hearing the court finds that there are irreconcilable differences which have caused the irremediable breakdown of the marriage, the court shall order the dissolution of the marriage or a legal separation of the parties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2334.

(a) If it appears that there is a reasonable possibility of reconciliation, the court shall continue the proceeding for the dissolution of the marriage or for a legal separation of the parties for a period not to exceed 30 days.

(b) During the period of the continuance, the court may make orders for the support and maintenance of the parties, the custody of the minor children of the marriage, the support of children for whom support may be ordered, attorney’s fees, and for the preservation of the property of the parties.

(c) At any time after the termination of the period of the continuance, either party may move for the dissolution of the marriage or a legal separation of the parties, and the court may enter a judgment of dissolution of the marriage or legal separation of the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2335.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, in a pleading or proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation of the parties, including depositions and discovery proceedings, evidence of specific acts of misconduct is improper and inadmissible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2335.5.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation of the parties, where the judgment is to be entered by default, the petitioner shall provide the court clerk with a stamped envelope bearing sufficient postage addressed to the spouse who has defaulted, with the address of the court clerk as the return address, and the court clerk shall mail a copy of the request to enter default to that spouse in the envelope provided. A judgment of dissolution or legal separation, including relief requested in the petition, shall not be denied solely on the basis that the request to enter default was returned unopened to the court. The court clerk shall maintain any such document returned by the post office as part of the court file in the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2336.

(a) No judgment of dissolution or of legal separation of the parties may be granted upon the default of one of the parties or upon a statement or finding of fact made by a referee; but the court shall, in addition to the statement or finding of the referee, require proof of the grounds alleged, and the proof, if not taken before the court, shall be by affidavit. In all cases where there are minor children of the parties, each affidavit or offer of proof shall include an estimate by the declarant or affiant of the monthly gross income of each party. If the declarant or affiant has no knowledge of the estimated monthly income of a party, the declarant or affiant shall state why he or she has no knowledge. In all cases where there is a community estate, each affidavit or offer of proof shall include an estimate of the value of the assets and the debts the declarant or affiant proposes to be distributed to each party, unless the declarant or affiant has filed, or
 concurrently files, a complete and accurate property declaration with the court.

(b) If the proof is by affidavit, the personal appearance of the affiant is required only when it appears to the court that any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) Reconciliation of the parties is reasonably possible.

(2) A proposed child custody order is not in the best interest of the child.

(3) A proposed child support order is less than a noncustodial parent is capable of paying.

(4) A personal appearance of a party or interested person would be in the best interests of justice.

(c) An affidavit submitted pursuant to this section shall contain a stipulation by the affiant that the affiant understands that proof will be by affidavit and that the affiant will not appear before the court unless so ordered by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 581, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2337.

(a) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, the court, upon noticed motion, may sever and grant an early and separate trial on the issue of the dissolution of the status of the marriage apart from other issues.

(b) A preliminary declaration of disclosure with a completed schedule of assets and debts shall be served on the nonmoving party with the noticed motion unless it has been served previously, or unless the parties stipulate in writing to defer service of the preliminary declaration of disclosure until a later time.

(c) The court may impose upon a party any of the following conditions
 on granting a severance of the issue of the dissolution of the status of the marriage, and in case of that party’s death, an order of any of the following conditions continues to be binding upon that party’s estate:

(1) The party shall indemnify and hold the other party harmless from any taxes, reassessments, interest, and penalties payable by the other party in connection with the division of the community estate that would not have been payable if the parties were still married at the time the division was made.

(2) Until judgment has been entered on all remaining issues and has become final, the party shall maintain all existing health and medical insurance coverage for the other party and any minor children as named dependents, so long as the party is eligible to do so. If
 at any time during this period the party is not eligible to maintain that coverage, the party shall, at the party’s sole expense, provide and maintain health and medical insurance coverage that is comparable to the existing health and medical insurance coverage to the extent it is available. To the extent that coverage is not available, the party shall be responsible to pay, and shall demonstrate to the court’s satisfaction the ability to pay, for the health and medical care for the other party and the minor children, to the extent that care would have been covered by the existing insurance coverage but for the dissolution of marital status, and shall otherwise indemnify and hold the other party harmless from any adverse consequences resulting from the loss or reduction of the existing coverage. For purposes of this subdivision, “health and medical insurance coverage” includes any coverage for which the
 parties are eligible under any group or individual health or other medical plan, fund, policy, or program.

(3) Until judgment has been entered on all remaining issues and has become final, the party shall indemnify and hold the other party harmless from any adverse consequences to the other party if the bifurcation results in a termination of the other party’s right to a probate homestead in the residence in which the other party resides at the time the severance is granted.

(4) Until judgment has been entered on all remaining issues and has become final, the party shall indemnify and hold the other party harmless from any adverse consequences to the other party if the bifurcation results in the loss of the rights of the other party to a probate family allowance as the surviving spouse of
 the party.

(5) Until judgment has been entered on all remaining issues and has become final, the party shall indemnify and hold the other party harmless from any adverse consequences to the other party if the bifurcation results in the loss of the other party’s rights with respect to any retirement, survivor, or deferred compensation benefits under any plan, fund, or arrangement, or to any elections or options associated therewith, to the extent that the other party would have been entitled to those benefits or elections as the spouse or surviving spouse of the party.

(6) The party shall indemnify and hold the other party harmless from any adverse consequences if the bifurcation results in the loss of rights to social security benefits or elections to the extent the other party
 would have been entitled to those benefits or elections as the surviving spouse of the party.

(7) (A) The court may make an order pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5040 of the Probate Code, if appropriate, that a party maintain a beneficiary designation for a nonprobate transfer, as described in Section 5000 of the Probate Code, for a spouse or domestic partner for up to one-half of or, upon a showing of good cause, for all of a nonprobate transfer asset until judgment has been entered with respect to the community ownership of that asset, and until the other party’s interest therein has been distributed to him or her.

(B) Except upon a showing of good cause, this paragraph does not apply to any of the following:

(i) A nonprobate transfer described in Section 5000 of the Probate Code that was not created by either party or that was acquired by either party by gift, descent, or devise.

(ii) An irrevocable trust.

(iii) A trust of which neither party is the grantor.

(iv) Powers of appointment under a trust instrument that was not created by either party or of which neither party is a grantor.

(v) The execution and filing of a disclaimer pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 260) of Division 2 of the Probate Code.

(vi) The appointment of a party as a
 trustee.

(8) In order to preserve the ability of the party to defer the distribution of the Individual Retirement Account or annuity (IRA) established under Section 408 or 408A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, (IRC) upon the death of the other party, the court may require that one-half, or all upon a showing of good cause, of the community interest in any IRA, by or for the benefit of the party, be assigned and transferred to the other party pursuant to Section 408(d)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. This paragraph does not limit the power granted pursuant to subdivision (g).

(9) Upon a showing that circumstances exist that would place a substantial burden of enforcement upon either party’s community property rights or would eliminate the ability of the surviving party to
 enforce his or her community property rights if the other party died before the division and distribution or compliance with any court-ordered payment of any community property interest therein, including, but not limited to, a situation in which preemption under federal law applies to an asset of a party, or purchase by a bona fide purchaser has occurred, the court may order a specific security interest designed to reduce or eliminate the likelihood that a postmortem enforcement proceeding would be ineffective or unduly burdensome to the surviving party. For this purpose, those orders may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) An order that the party provide an undertaking.

(B) An order to provide a security interest by Qualified Domestic Relations Order from that
 party’s share of a retirement plan or plans.

(C) An order for the creation of a trust as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 82 of the Probate Code.

(D) An order for other arrangements as may be reasonably necessary and feasible to provide appropriate security in the event of the party’s death before judgment has been entered with respect to the community ownership of that asset, and until the other party’s interest therein has been distributed to him or her.

(E) If a retirement plan is not subject to an enforceable court order for the payment of spousal survivor benefits to the other party, an interim order requiring the party to pay or cause to be paid, and to post adequate security for the payment of,
 any survivor benefit that would have been payable to the other party on the death of the party but for the judgment granting a dissolution of the status of the marriage, pending entry of judgment on all remaining issues.

(10) Any other condition the court determines is just and equitable.

(d) Prior to, or simultaneously with, entry of judgment granting dissolution of the status of the marriage, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The party’s retirement or pension plan shall be joined as a party to the proceeding for dissolution, unless joinder is precluded or made unnecessary by Title 1 of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.), as amended (ERISA), or any
 other applicable law.

(2) To preserve the claims of each spouse in all retirement plan benefits upon entry of judgment granting a dissolution of the status of the marriage, the court shall enter one of the following in connection with the judgment for each retirement plan in which either party is a participant:

(A) An order pursuant to Section 2610 disposing of each party’s interest in retirement plan benefits, including survivor and death benefits.

(B) An interim order preserving the nonemployee party’s right to retirement plan benefits, including survivor and death benefits, pending entry of judgment on all remaining issues.

(C) An attachment to the
 judgment granting a dissolution of the status of the marriage, as follows:

EACH PARTY (insert names and addresses) IS PROVISIONALLY AWARDED WITHOUT PREJUDICE AND SUBJECT TO ADJUSTMENT BY A SUBSEQUENT DOMESTIC RELATIONS ORDER, A SEPARATE INTEREST EQUAL TO ONE-HALF OF ALL BENEFITS ACCRUED OR TO BE ACCRUED UNDER THE PLAN (name each plan individually) AS A RESULT OF EMPLOYMENT OF THE OTHER PARTY DURING THE MARRIAGE OR DOMESTIC PARTNERSHIP AND PRIOR TO THE DATE OF SEPARATION. IN ADDITION, PENDING FURTHER NOTICE, THE PLAN SHALL, AS ALLOWED BY LAW, OR IN THE CASE OF A GOVERNMENTAL PLAN, AS ALLOWED BY THE TERMS OF THE PLAN, CONTINUE TO TREAT THE PARTIES AS MARRIED OR DOMESTIC PARTNERS FOR PURPOSES OF ANY SURVIVOR RIGHTS OR BENEFITS AVAILABLE UNDER THE PLAN TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO PROVIDE
 FOR PAYMENT OF AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THAT SEPARATE INTEREST OR
 FOR ALL OF THE SURVIVOR BENEFIT IF AT THE TIME OF THE DEATH OF THE PARTICIPANT, THERE IS NO OTHER ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT OF THE SURVIVOR BENEFIT.

(e) The moving party shall promptly serve a copy of any order, interim order, or attachment entered pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), and a copy of the judgment granting a dissolution of the status of the marriage, on the retirement or pension plan administrator.

(f) A judgment granting a dissolution of the status of the marriage shall expressly reserve jurisdiction for later determination of all other pending issues.

(g) If the party dies after the entry of judgment granting a dissolution of marriage, any obligation imposed by
 this section shall be enforceable against any asset, including the proceeds thereof, against which these obligations would have been enforceable prior to the person’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2338.

(a) In a proceeding for dissolution of the marriage or legal separation of the parties, the court shall file its decision and any statement of decision as in other cases.

(b) If the court determines that no dissolution should be granted, a judgment to that effect only shall be entered.

(c) If the court determines that a dissolution should be granted, a judgment of dissolution of marriage shall be entered. After the entry of the judgment and before it becomes final, neither party has the right to dismiss the proceeding without the consent of the other.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2338.5.

Where a judgment of dissolution or nullity of marriage or legal separation of the parties is to be granted upon the default of one of the parties:

(a) The signature of the spouse who has defaulted on any marital settlement agreement or on any stipulated judgment shall be notarized.

(b) The court clerk shall give notice of entry of judgment of dissolution of marriage, nullity of marriage, or legal separation to the attorney for each party or to the party, if unrepresented.

(c) For the purpose of mailing the notice of entry of judgment, the party submitting the judgment shall provide the court clerk with a stamped envelope bearing sufficient postage addressed to the attorney for the other party or to the party, if unrepresented, with the address of the court clerk as the return address. The court clerk shall maintain any such document returned by the post office as part of the court file in the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 810, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2339.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b) and to Sections 2340 to 2344, inclusive, no judgment of dissolution is final for the purpose of terminating the marriage relationship of the parties until six months have expired from the date of service of a copy of summons and petition or the date of appearance of the respondent, whichever occurs first.

(b) The court may extend the six-month period described in subdivision (a) for good cause shown.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2340.

A judgment of dissolution of marriage shall specify the date on which the judgment becomes finally effective for the purpose of terminating the marriage relationship of the parties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2341.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2340, if an appeal is taken from the judgment or a motion for a new trial is made, the dissolution of marriage does not become final until the motion or appeal has been finally disposed of, nor then, if the motion has been granted or judgment reversed.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the filing of an appeal or of a motion for a new trial does not stay the effect of a judgment insofar as it relates to the dissolution of the marriage status and restoring the parties to the status of unmarried persons, unless the appealing or moving party specifies in the notice of appeal or motion for new trial an objection to the termination of the marriage status. No party may make such an objection to the termination of the marriage status unless such an objection was also made at the time of trial.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2342.

Where a joint petition for summary dissolution under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2400) is thereafter revoked and either party commences a proceeding pursuant to Section 2330 within 90 days from the date of the filing of the revocation, the date the judgment becomes a final judgment under Section 2339 shall be calculated by deducting the period of time that has elapsed from the date of filing the joint petition to the date of filing the revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 190, Sec. 3.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2342.5.

(a) (1) If the parties file a joint petition for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation of the parties and joint summons in accordance with Sections 2330 and 2331, for identification purposes, including, but not limited to, identification on a Judicial Council form, the first joint petitioner shall be deemed petitioner and the other joint petitioner shall be deemed respondent.

(2) A joint summons shall include the temporary restraining order required by Section 2040.

(3) Section 412.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply to a joint summons.

(b) (1) At any time before the entry of judgment on the joint petition, without leave of court, in a form and content approved by the Judicial Council, a petitioner may file an amended petition or the respondent may file an amended response.

(2) (A) If either party is served with an amended petition or amended response, the party served shall file and serve an amended petition or amended response, as applicable, within 30 days, in accordance with Section 2020, in a form and content approved by the Judicial Council.

(B) Subject to the court’s discretion to regulate the order of proof, pursuant to Section 320 of the Evidence Code, the order of proof shall be determined by the order of
 service of the amended pleadings.

(3) If an amended petition or amended response is filed pursuant to paragraph (1), the joint petition for dissolution or for legal separation of the parties is deemed revoked and the proceeding shall proceed as a petition for dissolution or for legal separation of the parties under Section 2330. The filing date of the joint petition shall be considered the filing date for the action and all relevant deadlines, including, but not limited to, the deadlines set forth in Section 2339.

(4) A temporary restraining order included in the summons shall remain in effect if a party files an amended petition or amended response.

(c) The parties may file an amended joint petition. The filing of
 an amended joint petition does not affect the parties’ ability to proceed pursuant to a joint petition.

(d) Either party may seek discovery, as set forth in the Code of Civil Procedure, under the joint petition process.

(e) If either party files a request for order, including, but not limited to, a request for a motion to compel or other discovery motion, or request for trial setting with the court, that party shall file an amended petition or amended response, pursuant to subdivision (b), before making, or simultaneously with, the request.

(f) A judgment based on the agreement of the parties shall be in the same form as if one party had filed a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation and the other party had filed
 a response to the petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation or otherwise appeared prior to entry of judgment because both joint petitioners will have appeared in the matter pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2331 due to the filing of a joint petition.

(g) The provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 2000) of this code that apply to a petition for dissolution of marriage or for the legal separation of the parties also apply to a joint petition for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation of the parties unless otherwise provided for by this section, in which case the provisions of this section shall supersede.

(h) The filing of a joint petition shall be accompanied by the fees provided in subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 70670 of the Government
 Code and the supplemental fees provided in Sections 70602.5 and 70602.6 of the Government Code unless both parties have been granted a fee waiver pursuant to Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 190, Sec. 4.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2342.51.

The Judicial Council shall adopt or amend any rules or forms necessary to implement Section 2342.5 on or before January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 190, Sec. 5.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2343.

The court may, upon notice and for good cause shown, or on stipulation of the parties, retain jurisdiction over the date of termination of the marital status, or may order that the marital status be terminated at a future specified date. On the date of termination of the marital status, the parties are restored to the status of unmarried persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2344.

(a) The death of either party after entry of the judgment does not prevent the judgment from becoming a final judgment under Sections 2339 to 2343, inclusive.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not validate a marriage by either party before the judgment becomes final, nor does it constitute a defense in a criminal prosecution against either party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2345.

The court may not render a judgment of the legal separation of the parties without the consent of both parties unless one party has not made a general appearance and the petition is one for legal separation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2346.

(a) If the court determines that a judgment of dissolution of the marriage should be granted, but by mistake, negligence, or inadvertence, the judgment has not been signed, filed, and entered, the court may cause the judgment to be signed, dated, filed, and entered in the proceeding as of the date when the judgment could have been signed, dated, filed, and entered originally, if it appears to the satisfaction of the court that no appeal is to be taken in the proceeding or motion made for a new trial, to annul or set aside the judgment, or for relief under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 469) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The court may act under subdivision (a) on its own motion or upon the motion of either party to the proceeding. In contested cases, the motion of a party shall be with notice to the other party.

(c) The court may cause the judgment to be entered nunc pro tunc as
 provided in this section, even though the judgment may have been previously entered, where through mistake, negligence, or inadvertence the judgment was not entered as soon as it could have been entered under the law if applied for.
